Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 25.5. State and Local Tax Liens

38-25.5-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorized person” means:

A person who has obtained a written authorization signed and notarized by a taxpayer to receive a certificate of taxes due for the taxpayer, to receive copies of tax returns and filings by the taxpayer with a public entity, to receive a summary statement of tax payments made to any public entity by the taxpayer, or all of the above, to the degree set forth in the authorization. The authorization may be a signed original or a copy thereof and may be a separate document or part of a more general document; or

A lending institution that has obtained written authorization from a borrower to receive notification from the department of revenue when the borrower is delinquent in the payment of sales and use taxes, special fuel taxes, withholding taxes, gas taxes, or aviation fuel taxes. The authorization may be a signed and dated original or a copy thereof and may be a separate document or part of a more general document.

“Lender” means a person who has made a loan of value to a taxpayer in good faith and not for the purposes of evading this article.

“Public entity” means the state and every county, city and county, city, town, school district, special improvement district, special district, and every other kind of district, agency, instrumentality, political subdivision, or taxing authority of the state organized pursuant to state law, whether or not it is subject to home rule.

“Statement of intent” means a declaration by a lender or transferor that he intends to foreclose or transfer assets. A statement of intent need not specify a date certain for such foreclosure or transfer.

“Tax” means a tax and assessment collected by a public entity which is secured by a first and prior lien, including any interest, additional amount, additions to tax, penalties, and costs that are due.

“Tax liability” means the liability of a taxpayer for a tax.

“Tax lien” means a lien imposed by state or local law to secure the payment of a tax liability.

“Transferee” means a person to whom assets are transferred, as provided in section 38-25.5-102 (3).

“Transferor” means a person who transfers assets, as provided in section 38-25.5-102 (3).

“Treasurer” means the treasurer, director of the department of revenue, sales and use tax administrator, or the chief tax collection officer of a public entity.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1640, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 986, § 1, effective July 1.

38-25.5-102.
Certificate of taxes due.

As soon as practical but in no event later than thirty days after receipt of a written request from a taxpayer or authorized person, the treasurer of a public entity shall certify in writing as of the date of the certificate the full amount of the taxes identified in the request known to be due from the taxpayer. If there is a delinquency in the payment of taxes of an unknown amount, the public entity shall, if practical, provide a good faith estimate of the amount of the taxes due and indicate on the certificate that the figure provided is an estimate. A fee of ten dollars shall be collected for each specifically identified tax included in a certificate issued by a public entity in response to a request.

Notwithstanding the amount of the fee specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), if the public entity collecting the fee is a state agency, the executive director of the state agency, by rule or as otherwise provided by law, may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the state agency, by rule or as otherwise provided by law, may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary:

When signed by the treasurer of a public entity, a certificate of taxes due shall be conclusive evidence for all purposes and against all persons, including the public entity, that, at the time of certification, the property of the taxpayer was free and clear of all such identified taxes due and any tax liens arising therefrom or was subject to each such identified tax due and any tax lien arising therefrom in a stated or estimated amount; and

If more than one certificate of taxes due is issued by the treasurer of the same public entity with respect to the same taxpayer and the later certificate sets forth an amount of taxes due for a particular tax which is:

In excess of the amount set forth in the earlier certificate, the earlier certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the amount of taxes due and any tax liens arising therefrom as of the date of that earlier certificate. The later certificate shall be evidence of the amount of taxes due and any tax liens arising therefrom as of the date of the later certificate, but any tax lien arising therefrom shall only be effective for the amount of taxes which became due after the date of the earlier certificate.

Less than the amount set forth in the earlier certificate, the later certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the amount of taxes due and any tax liens arising therefrom as of the date of the later certificate;

Any tax lien arising from taxes becoming due after the date of the latest certificate of taxes due shall not be affected by this section.

This subsection (3) shall apply only to taxes identified in and due as of the date of a certificate of taxes due. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if a public entity completes an audit or investigation subsequent to the date of such certificate which reveals a tax liability for the identified taxes due as of the date of a certificate previously issued in excess of the amount certified in the certificate, then the public entity shall retain whatever rights and remedies for collection of such tax liability as otherwise provided by state or local law; except that:

In the event of a foreclosure initiated by a lender which results in a sale of assets subject to any tax lien to a purchaser other than the lender, such tax lien shall remain a lien on such assets but not on the proceeds to the lender of the foreclosure sale, and neither the lender nor the purchaser shall have any personal liability for the tax liability underlying the tax lien;

In the event of a foreclosure initiated by a lender which results in a sale of assets subject to any tax lien to the lender or in the event of a transfer of assets subject to any tax lien to a lender in lieu of foreclosure, such tax lien shall remain a lien on such assets, but the lender shall not have any personal liability for the tax liability underlying the tax lien;

In the event the circumstances described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) occur and the lender subsequently sells such assets to a purchaser, such tax lien shall remain a lien on such assets but not on the proceeds to the lender of the sale, and neither the lender nor the purchaser shall have any personal liability for the tax liability underlying the tax lien; and

In the event the circumstances described in subparagraph (I) or subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a) occur and the purchaser transfers such assets to a subsequent purchaser, such tax lien shall remain a lien on such assets but not on the proceeds of sale, and neither the subsequent purchaser nor any subsequent purchaser thereafter shall have any personal liability for the tax liability underlying the tax lien.

In order to qualify for the protections provided by this subsection (3), a lender or transferor shall comply with the following requirements:

Upon receipt of a written request from a public entity, the lender or transferor shall promptly provide to the public entity a description of any assets of the taxpayer subject to a tax lien which have been transferred and the name and address of the transferee of such assets. The lender or transferor shall maintain records relating to such asset transfers for a minimum of four years; and

Prior to a foreclosure sale or transfer of taxpayer assets which may be subject to a tax lien, the lender or transferor shall request or cause to be requested from the appropriate public entity a certificate of taxes due. Such request shall be accompanied by or shall include a statement of intent. Such certificate of taxes due shall have been issued no more than six months prior to the date of the foreclosure sale or transfer of assets.

This section shall not apply to general taxes for real property as governed by articles 1 to 14 of title 39, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1641, § 1, effective January, 1, 1991.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 556, § 1, effective May 23.

38-25.5-103.
Copies of returns and filings - summary statement - fees.

As soon as practical but in no event later than thirty days after receipt of a written request from a taxpayer or authorized person, the treasurer of a public entity shall provide, as to taxes of the public entity which are specifically identified in the request, either copies of returns and filings by the taxpayer which are in the possession or custody of the public entity or a summary statement of tax payments made by the taxpayer to the public entity. A request made under the provisions of this section shall be limited to the current year and the previous three years. A request made by an authorized person shall be limited to the extent set forth in the written authorization of the authorized person.

A request made pursuant to this section may be either in the form of a request for copies of tax returns and filings or in the form of a request for a summary statement but may not contain both types of requests. If the specified form of the request cannot be readily complied with by the treasurer, the treasurer shall so notify the requesting party and may comply with the request by furnishing the information in the alternative form.

A fee of ten dollars shall be collected for each specifically identified tax included in such summary statement issued by a public entity. A fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents shall be collected for each page of tax returns and filings of a taxpayer copied and delivered by a public entity.

Notwithstanding the amount of any fee specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), if the public entity collecting the fee is a state agency, the executive director of the state agency by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the state agency by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

This section shall not apply to general taxes for real property as governed by articles 1 to 14 of title 39, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1643, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 1346, § 80, effective June 1.

38-25.5-103.5.
Notification requirements - tax delinquency notification fund - creation - immunity.

The department of revenue shall provide information to any lending institution that is an authorized person regarding the delinquent payment of sales and use tax, withholding tax, special fuels tax, gas tax, or aviation fuel tax by a borrower of funds from such institution provided such delinquency is in distraint warrant stage. The department shall honor any request made by a lending institution that is an authorized person to the extent set forth in the written authorization. Such provision of information shall be made in accordance with rules promulgated by the department, which shall include the following:

The procedures pursuant to which lending institutions may request notification under this section, when such notification will be provided by the department, and the manner in which such information shall be provided;

The amount of the filing fee needed to cover programming and other administrative costs, which may be adjusted periodically by the department and not necessarily at the beginning of the year;

The level, type, or degree of delinquency subject to the disclosure provided by this section;

Any other information needed for the implementation of this section.

The level, type, or degree of delinquency subject to the disclosure provided by this section shall be set by the department of revenue.

The department shall transmit any filing fees collected pursuant to this section to the state treasurer, who shall deposit such fees in the state treasury in the tax delinquency notification fund, which fund is hereby created. Moneys so deposited and all interest earned on such moneys shall be retained in the fund.

History.

Source:
L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 987, § 2, effective July 1.

38-25.5-104.
Civil liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no public entity, lender, authorized person, or transferor or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof shall be liable in any civil action for damages to a taxpayer, authorized person, transferee, or any other person for any act done or omitted in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1643, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

38-25.5-105.
Department of revenue fees.

Except as provided in section 38-25.5-103.5, fees collected by the department of revenue pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the state treasury in the tax lien certification fund which is hereby created. Moneys so deposited and all interest earned on such moneys shall be used by the department of revenue for the purposes of this article in accordance with the annual appropriation by the general assembly and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund; except that moneys in excess of the maximum reserve, as defined in section 24-75-402 (2)(e.5), C.R.S., that remain in the fund at the end of any state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2000, shall be transferred to the general fund.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1643, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 987, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 556, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1261), ch. 322, p. 1315, § 10, effective June 5.